Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 5

Tennessee Local Development Authority Rural Fire Protection Equipment Act of 1986

4-31-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Local Development Authority Rural Fire Protection Equipment Act of 1986.”

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-502. Intent.

It is in the interest and welfare of the people of Tennessee that the Tennessee local development authority be empowered to issue its revenue bonds, and to make the proceeds available for loans to counties for the purchase of equipment for the use of county or volunteer fire departments serving unincorporated areas of the county, in order to improve county and other rural fire protection, which will in turn result in improvements in fire ratings and a reduction in fire insurance premiums.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-503. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Equipment” means fire engines, ladders, hooks, hoses and all other equipment necessary for the containing and extinguishing of fires; and

“Loan agreement” means a contractual arrangement by and between a county and the authority pursuant to and in accordance with this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-504. Loans for the purchase of equipment for the use of county or volunteer fire departments by counties receiving state-shared taxes — Schedule of payments.

For the purpose of providing moneys to fund loans authorized by this part, the authority, in addition to the powers otherwise created by law, has the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time negotiable bonds and notes of the authority in an amount not to exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in accordance with the terms set forth in §§ 4-31-105, 4-31-106 and 4-31-107(d).

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this part shall not be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to any other provisions of this chapter or any other law; provided, that the foregoing shall not prohibit the issuance of separate issues of bonds or notes pursuant to this part.

In addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, the authority has the power and is authorized to make loans to any county for the acquisition of equipment for the use of county or volunteer fire departments serving the unincorporated areas of a county pursuant to a loan agreement between the county and the authority. Such loans shall be made from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the authority for the purpose of making such loans.

The authority shall establish a repayment schedule to be made by a county under a loan agreement.

Such repayments shall be in such amounts as will be at least sufficient, together with other funds available therefor, to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds and notes issued by the authority for the purpose of providing loans to counties for the purchase of equipment, and as may be necessary for the authority to maintain a reserve for debt service.

The authority may collect an administrative fee in addition to such repayment schedule in an amount as may be set forth in the loan agreement.

At the time of approval of a loan agreement, the annual repayment schedule applicable to all approved loans to a county under this part, when combined with the annual repayment schedules applicable to approved loans to counties under title 68, chapter 221, parts 2 and 5, [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed], or any other loan agreement entered into between the county and the authority pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the unobligated amount of annual state-shared taxes paid to the county as shown by the latest completed audit for the state's fiscal year.

Nothing contained in this subsection (d) shall require a uniform test for all loans, it being the intent of the general assembly that the authority exercise discretion based on the facts and circumstances of each loan.

In exercising its discretion, the authority shall take into consideration the general financial condition of the county receiving the loan.

For purposes of determining compliance with this subsection (d), the annual repayment schedule for each loan shall be, in cases prior to the funding of such loans or where such loans have been financed on an interim basis other than by bonds, an estimated annual repayment schedule showing debt service requirements under the loan agreements as if the bonds to be issued to fund such loans will bear interest at a rate per annum and mature in such manner as the authority shall establish at the time of the approval of each such loan and, in cases where bonds have been issued to fund such loan, the actual debt service requirements on such bonds.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Title 68, chapter 211, part 4, referred to in this section and concerning resource and energy recovery, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 846, § 48, effective July 1, 1996.

4-31-505. Administration of loans.

The authority shall administer loans made under this part.

In so doing, the authority may adopt rules and regulations necessary for the effective administration of this part, including the promulgation of prerequisites that must be fulfilled by the county in order to be eligible for a loan, procedures to be followed in making loan applications to the authority, procedures to be followed in the disbursement of loan funds, and procedures for enforcing agreements entered into by a county with the authority.

Any county entering into a loan agreement with the authority must state in the loan application, in addition to any requirements established by the authority pursuant to rules and regulations, that the purchase of the equipment is reasonably calculated to result in a reduction of fire insurance premium rates for businesses and residents within the unincorporated area of the county served by the county or volunteer fire department.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-506. Loan agreements.

Subject to § 4-31-505 and subject to any existing contractual obligations of the county, the authority may enter into loan agreements with any county, and any county may enter into loan agreements with the authority for loans for equipment for the use of county or volunteer fire departments serving the unincorporated area of the county.

Any loan agreement may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the authority and the county, subject to § 4-31-505 and shall additionally include, in substance, the following:

The amount of the loan, not to exceed the estimated reasonable cost of the equipment to be purchased, as determined by the authority; and

An agreement by the local government unit to:

Proceed expeditiously with the purchase in accordance with the loan agreement approved pursuant to this part;

Not dispose of the equipment without the prior approval of the authority;

Pledge any available sources of revenue to make payment according to the repayment schedule established by the authority, including state-shared taxes, and to make such payments; and

Establish and maintain adequate financial records for the equipment, including maintaining an inventory, and cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, and to furnish a copy of such audits to the comptroller of the treasury.

Failure of a county to file the audit required by subdivision (b)(2)(D) with the comptroller of the treasury each year, until the loan, together with interest is totally repaid, constitutes a Class A misdemeanor and anyone violating this provision, upon conviction, shall be liable for a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation, within the discretion of the court, and each day of continued violation constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, 40-35-111.

4-31-507. Further agreements and guarantees.

The authority has the right to enter into such further agreements with a county and require such further guarantees or securities as it may see fit prior to, or simultaneously with, the issuance of bonds or to refuse to issue bonds until such agreements or securities, in any form that the authority may elect, are agreed to or are obtained.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-508. Approval of agreements — Payments subject to audit.

All loan agreements entered into pursuant to this part shall be subject to approval by the attorney general and reporter as to the form and by the commissioner of finance and administration, and all payments made pursuant to such loan agreements shall be made on vouchers approved by the authority, and such payments shall be subject to audit at any time.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-509. Allocation of funds — Criteria.

In allocating loan funds to counties, the authority shall give consideration to, and apply, the following standards and criteria:

The need and desirability for such equipment; and

The ability of the county to secure borrowed money from other sources and costs thereof.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-510. Tax levy to meet payments.

In the event the funds pledged shall be insufficient to meet the payments as established by the authority, any county shall levy a tax on property sufficient to make such payments, which shall be in addition to all other taxes authorized or limited by law.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-511. Failure to make payments — Withholding of state-shared revenues authorized.

In the event any county having entered into a loan agreement shall fail to remit funds in accordance with the annual repayment schedule established by the authority, the commissioner, within five (5) days of such failure, shall deliver by certified mail a written notice of such failure to the county.

In the event the county shall fail to remit the amount set forth in the notice within sixty (60) days of the receipt of the notice, the commissioner shall, without further authorization, withhold such sum or part of such sum from any state-shared taxes that are otherwise apportioned to such county for the benefit of the authority issuing bonds or notes for the purposes referred to in this part.

A county shall not have any claims on state-shared taxes withheld as permitted under the terms of this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-512. Authority to establish rural fire protection equipment fund — Disposition of funds.

The authority is hereby authorized to establish in the state treasury a separate special trust fund of the authority for each separate issue of bonds or notes that is similarly secured, to be known as the “rural fire protection equipment fund,” and to bear such additional designation as the authority deems appropriate to properly identify each fund.

The state hereby covenants and agrees that from and after the issuance of any bonds or notes under and pursuant to this part, moneys derived by the state from payments made pursuant to loan agreements with such counties and moneys withheld from state-shared taxes apportioned to such counties as permitted under the terms of the loan agreements that are pledged to the payment of such bonds or notes shall be paid into the particular fund established for the issuance of bonds or notes to which such moneys are pledged.

Such moneys shall be accounted for separately from all other moneys in the state treasury and shall be applied by the authority solely for the purpose of paying principal of and interest and premium, if any, on such issue of bonds and notes issued pursuant to this section, refunding moneys due to participating counties where appropriate, and paying all other costs incidental to the administration of the authority in connection with the loan agreements and the issuance of such issue of bonds and notes.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-513. Enforcing of agreement by court action.

The authority has the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the county and the governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee of the county to carry out any agreements and to perform its and their duties under this part or under any rule or regulation of the authority adopted pursuant thereto.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-514. Debt limit not applicable.

Any county may enter into loan agreements under this part notwithstanding and without regard to any limit on indebtedness provided by law.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-515. Actions of governing body by resolution.

All action required or authorized to be taken under this part by the governing body of any county may be by resolution, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting of the governing body at which such resolution is introduced and shall take effect immediately upon its adoption.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.

4-31-516. Provisions supplemental.

This part shall be in addition and supplemental to any other law providing for the financing of the purchase of equipment by counties and shall not be deemed to amend or repeal any other law.

No proceedings by a county shall be required for loan agreements hereunder, except as provided by this part, any law to the contrary notwithstanding.

No other requirements or restrictions applicable to borrowing by any county contained in any other law shall be applicable to loans under this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 14.